output_dics/Compressed_dics/pt_DOFUS/pt_DOFUS.dic
abóbowa/B
Adagossada/B
Ael/F
Aele/F
Akwólatra/B
Albuerano/BDF
Ale/DF
alificha/B
Allanhão/B
Allisterine/F
Almardente/B
alquilusão/B
Alterófilo/F
Amakniana/B
Amakniano/BDF
amakniano/BDF
Amargandaio/F
amartanto/B
Amiglurso/B
Aminita/B
Ananin/B
Angelo/F
Ankafiliado/F
Ankamiana/B
Ankamiano/BDF
Ankaventureiro/F
Aoatak/B
Apewicubo/B
Arak-hai/B
Arakne/BDF
Arakno/DF
Araknofóbico/BDF
Arko/B
Arm/DF
Armaduro/DF
Armel/F
Armutinado/B
Arquibufo/B
Arquimonstro/B
Arvrakne/B
Arvraknidiano/BDF
Arvraknídeo/BDF
Aspirassino/B
Assassispírito/BDF
Astrubiana/B
astrubiano/BDF
Astrubiano/BDF
Avraknídeo/B
awaw/B
Az'Hassino/BDF
Bacterrível/B
bakelelita/B
Bakeneko/B
Bako/DF
Ballo/F
Bananagrume/B
Barba-Mundo/B
Barbastrela/B
Bawoso/F
Ben/B
Bestiólogo/BDF
Betaventureiro/F
Bicho-da-sede/F
bicho-da-sede/F
Bil/B
Bitufo/B
Blinduro/B
Blopavê/B
Bobol/F
Boloto/BDF
Bombomba/B
Bone/F
Bono/F
Bontariana/B
Bontariano/BDF
bontariano/BDF
Boon/B
Borcego/B
Brador/B
Brakmariana/B
Brakmariano/BDF
brakmariano/BDF
Bram/F
Braçor/B
Brikolérico/B
Brindófilo/F
Brutanã/B
Brutanão/BDF
BRUTANÃO/BDF
Brákaro/B
Bubopressor/B
Bulbonito/B
Bulbusto/B
Bulgurdo/BDF
Bushitake/B
Bwariok/B
Bwork/B
Bworkídio/F
Búlbico/F
Cabeço/BDF
Cacamundongo/B
Cactana/B
Cacterror/B
Capacetuíter/B
Capel/F
Carangolho/B
Carl/F
Carniçangue/B
Cartolino/F
Caçamador/B
cenouwa/B
Centoro/BDF
Cervaclara/B
Chafer/BDF
Champéu/B
Chef/B
Chiko/F
Chocoligarca/B
Chumbinha/B
Cigrou/B
Clocinomo/B
Cofrim/B
Coguknídeo/B
Colorvivo/F
Compenficha/B
Control/F
Corbrak/B
Costumago/BDF
costumago/BDF
Crimificha/B
Crocuzkiano/BDF
crocuzkiano/BDF
cronoanomalia/B
Cronomorfo/B
cronomágico/BDF
Cronomágico/BDF
Crustocana/B
Cur/DF
Cuwativo/F
Cybwork/B
cárpino/B
Dade/DF
Dame/DF
Darumak/B
Dave/F
Dee/BDF
Dek/B
Deskronchador/F
Diablotroz/B
Dinho/F
Diondina/B
Djauliano/BDF
Dlagão/B
Dofawa/B
Dofusiano/F
Dok/B
Dolmenu/B
Doplão/B
doz/B
Dozeana/B
dozeano/BDF
Dozeano/BDF
Dragobunda/B
Dragokart/B
Dragombrio/F
Dragoneto/B
Dragoperu/B
Dragosa/B
Dragovo/B
Dragônico/F
Drakomparsa/B
Duno/DF
Ecaflip/B
Elementerra/B
Elfaceta/B
Eliocalíptico/F
Eliotrope/B
Ell/F
emote/B
Empurra-Pulga/B
ENIRIPSA/B
Enufort/B
Enutrof/B
Ephedryano/F
Escoliopendra/B
Escultomago/BDF
escultomago/BDF
Eskória/B
Esquilóxido/B
Eternasa/B
Eyro/F
Fabrice/F
Fabrimago/BDF
Fangshu/B
FECA/B
Feligiena/B
Feline/DF
Feroxugo/B
Festificha/B
Fichazarra/B
Fili/B
Floristilo/B
Forjamagia/B
Forjamago/BDF
forjamago/BDF
Fragmalma/B
freyesca/B
Friaka/B
Frigostiana/B
Frigostiano/BDF
frigostiano/BDF
Frigrodka/B
Furye/F
Galmatuno/B
Gam/F
Gambafete/B
Gargandyesco/BDF
Gatrobata/B
Geléia/B
Gem/DF
Geneficha/B
Gerbela/B
Geólico/F
Gho/F
Gitada/B
Gluende/B
Gluendina/B
Glurseleste/B
Glurso/BDF
Glursornado/B
Glutorrum/B
Gnaul/F
Gobalada/B
Gobilão/B
Goblin/B
Gobtrote/B
Gordopótamo/B
Gowdo/B
Grankoncha/B
gribado/BDF
Groblin/B
Grute/DF
Gualdião/B
Guawda/B
Guirlandeiro/F
Gupin/B
Gwaimo/B
Gwardaimo/B
Gárgrula/B
Hado/F
Hador/F
Haiku/B
Hako/F
Hakune/F
Hanno/F
Harpilha/B
Herbizarro/B
Herno/F
Hidragão/B
HispaÑico/F
Hispañico/F
Holbaid/B
Homlett/B
Horladelo/B
Huppermago/BDF
Hyrculano/F
Idiotô/B
Ikarranka/B
Ino-Naru/B
IOP/B
Isabelle/F
Isqilik/B
Javarok/B
Jin/B
Joiamago/BDF
joiamago/BDF
Julie/F
Kabushido/B
Kado/F
Kam/DF
Kama/B
Kamagnífico/F
Kamasterisko/B
Kanibola/B
Kanig/B
Kaniglu/B
Kanikila/B
Kano/F
Kaonashi/B
Kar/F
Kardorib/B
Kaska/B
Kasko/DF
katana/B
Kau/B
Kaze/F
Kerna/B
Khe/F
Kho/F
Kháurneo/B
Kido/B
KILORF/B
Kirbola/B
Kitsu/B
Kitsunebi/B
Koalak/B
Kobalita/B
Koisa/B
koko/BDF
Koko/BDF
Kokolante/B
Kola/B
Kole/DF
Kolifante/B
Komekom/B
Konto/F
Koração/B
Kralamor/B
Krolimera/B
Kronático/F
Kroscaixa/B
Krosmoglob/B
Króbio/B
krósmica/B
Krósmico/BDF
Kuadramorfo/B
Kurookin/B
Kwakau/B
Kwamurai/B
Kwapepino/BDF
Kópia/B
Lame/F
Lança-Pingwin/B
laposa/B
Lare/BDF
Larvesco/F
Lattecup/B
Lazur/F
leleite/B
Leosa/B
Leprechaun/B
Lesmoso/DF
Lete/F
Leviatum/B
Lhado/B
Lichangoro/BDF
Litrão/B
Lobichano/BD
Lobimiacha/B
Lolito/F
Loop/B
Luidy/B
Machamelo/B
Mado/F
Magitorrinco/B
Magnok/B
Maho/F
Maldyto/F
Malevigiante/B
Malterego/B
Malzerb/B
Mamagwin/B
Marelo/F
Marke/F
Martegelo/B
Mascotil/B
Mata-Moskito/B
Maufioso/F
Medibwork/B
melazteca/B
Mercemar/B
Meriane/F
Merida/B
Merídico/B
Metachado/B
Metiodent/B
Miatum/B
miausoléu/B
miawa/B
Miawki/B
Miawyena/B
Mikado/F
Mikotóxiko/F
Milimestre/B
Milirrato/B
Milobo/BDF
Mimibiótico/B
Minikrônio/B
Minja/B
Minó/B
Mipuk/B
Mir/F
Mobili/B
Montascote/B
Moonesco/F
Mopeat/B
Mordefunto/B
Morrito/B
Morti/B
Moskito/B
Mumístika/B
Mutagene/B
Nabur/F
Nantamorto/BDF
Nar/F
Nasumara/B
Nate/F
Nefilosa/B
Nekróbio/B
Nerve/F
Ness/B
Nihilo/F
Ninjawa/B
Nolho/B
None/F
Noo/F
Noob/B
Noxina/B
Noze/BDF
Nuit/B
Nônimo/F
Obareppon/B
Obe/F
Odi/B
Omanetta/B
Oni/B
Onil/B
Orfelino/B
oricor/B
Osatopiano/F
Oshimo/F
Osteomante/B
Otto/F
Ovaficha/B
Paf/B
Pandaliana/B
Pandaliano/BDF
pandaliano/BDF
Pandasiman/B
Pandawa/B
Pandawushu/B
Pandescudo/B
Pandido/BD
Pandikaze/B
Pandore/F
pandóbora/B
Pansoglurso/B
Papabol/F
Papabola/B
Papabolista/B
Papagoma/B
Paparneirinho/B
Paparneiro/BDF
Paparneiromute/B
Papatroz/B
Papatuderretido/B
Papatudinho/B
parfait/B
Paskwificador/F
Pedla/B
peixelado/B
Pekekoko/B
Pelassaku/B
Pensina/B
Pepito/DF
Perfuleiro/B
Pergaficha/B
Pergamante/B
pesk/B
Pewfuwadowa/B
Phrango/B
Piadaice/B
Piko/F
Pingobeso/B
Pinheto/B
Piralak/B
Piruta/B
Plantala/B
Plimok/B
Pod/B
Polikromático/F
Polneca/B
Porigami/B
Porkasso/BDF
Porquilobo/B
Prespic/B
Protonoxina/B
Pulgorda/B
Pwíncipe/B
Pêlo/B
Quaquá/B
Quebra-Nozivo/DF
Quimeriviva/B
Quimerivivo/DF
Quisnoa/B
Ramã/B
Ratrofiado/B
Rayo/BDF
Reconficha/B
Ressarcificha/B
Rikain/B
Rivalicha/B
Roleviva/B
Rolevivo/BD
Rosatruz/B
Ruel/F
Russula/B
Russule/DF
Rãnúfar/B
Rúnyco/F
Sabowoso/F
Sadida/B
Sakura/B
Salikrônia/B
Sam/F
Samiaurai/B
Sapatomago/BDF
sapatomago/BDF
Sapegajoso/B
Sapogro/B
Saquolheita/B
Scarafolha/B
Scordião/B
Serpluma/B
Shako/F
Shinobi/B
Shushu/B
Shushuesco/F
Shushuvivo/DF
Sibil/F
Sidimoteano/BDF
Sincro/B
Skentu/B
Skratea/B
Smagabola/B
Smif/B
Sniff/B
Snufle/B
Sparo/B
Spinho/B
Sramurai/B
Strateglurso/F
Strubiano/BDF
Sufokiana/B
sufokiano/BDF
Sufokiano/BDF
Sum/F
Sumen/B
Sunde/F
Superbala/B
Surimi/B
Sônio/F
Tado/F
Taivoga/B
Tanganiglu/B
Tanuki/B
Taserraia/B
Tecnomago/BDF
tecnomágico/BDF
Tecnomágico/BDF
Teko/F
Telefrag/B
tella/B
Tello/DF
Temme/F
tempoficha/B
Tentapa/B
Teo/F
Termolácteo/B
Tetanuki/B
Texmen/B
Texombra/B
Theo/F
Ticham/B
Tigraxé/B
Tinho/F
Tirubim/B
Tivo/F
Tocafogo/B
Toelho/BDF
Tofubina/B
Tofuleiro/B
Tofulminado/B
Tofuna/B
Tor/DF
Tornoficha/B
Tour/F
Traga-níquel/B
Trankilobo/B
Trebebum/B
Tremorsa/B
Triatum/B
Tronknídeo/B
Troolesco/F
Troolglodita/B
Trooligarka/B
Troolorror/B
Tsukinoichi/B
Tsukumogami/B
Tubarriso/B
Tyro/F
Tílico/F
Urtida/B
Vakakiwi/B
Valoniano/B
Vampyro/BDF
Vaposmag/B
verde-clara/B
Vetaurano/B
Vishkorita/B
Voráculo/B
vulkaniana/B
vulkaniano/BDF
Vulkaniano/BDF
Vulkórnio/B
Wab/B
Wabit/B
Waddictador/F
Wafoldi/B
Wakficionado/F
Wamen/B
Waufioso/BDF
Wei/B
westo/BDF
Wikkan/B
Wolvexugo/B
Xelomorfa/B
Xelomorfo/BDF
XELOR/BDF
Xelor/BDF
Xelore/BDF
Yokai/B
Yokomainu/B
Yugo/F
Yve/B
Zaap/B
Zadíoco/F
Zebúfalo/B
Zivo/F
Zumbificada/B
zumbificado/DF
Zumbificado/DF
Álmata/B
Ário/F
Ântemo/B
